dictionaries/hr_HR/hr_HR.aff
FLAG long
SFX VV Y      14
SFX VV ći     dem        ći
SFX VV ći     deš        ći
SFX VV ći     de         ći
SFX VV ći     demo       ći
SFX VV ći     dete       ći
SFX VV ći     du         ći
SFX VV ći     doh        ći
SFX VV ći     de         ći
SFX VV ći     dosmo      ći
SFX VV ći     doste      ći
SFX VV ći     doše       ći
SFX VV ći     di         ći
SFX VV ći     dimo       ći
SFX VV ći     dite       ći

SFX VU Y      19
SFX VU ći     čem        ći
SFX VU ći     češ        ći
SFX VU ći     če         ći
SFX VU ći     čemo       ći
SFX VU ći     čete       ći
SFX VU ći     ku         ći
SFX VU ći     koh        ći
SFX VU ći     kosmo      ći
SFX VU ći     koste      ći
SFX VU ći     koše       ći
SFX VU ći     ci         ći
SFX VU ći     cimo       ći
SFX VU ći     cite       ći
SFX VU ći     kao        ći
SFX VU ći     kla        ći
SFX VU ći     klo        ći
SFX VU ći     kli        ći
SFX VU ći     kle        ći
SFX VU ći     kavši      ći

SFX VT Y      20
SFX VT ći     knem       ći
SFX VT ći     kneš       ći
SFX VT ći     kne        ći
SFX VT ći     knemo      ći
SFX VT ći     knete      ći
SFX VT ći     knu        ći
SFX VT ći     koh        ći
SFX VT ći     če         ći
SFX VT ći     kosmo      ći
SFX VT ći     koste      ći
SFX VT ći     koše       ći
SFX VT ći     kni        ći
SFX VT ći     knimo      ći
SFX VT ći     knite      ći
SFX VT ći     kao        ći
SFX VT ći     kla        ći
SFX VT ći     klo        ći
SFX VT ći     kli        ći
SFX VT ći     kle        ći
SFX VT ći     kavši      ći

SFX VS Y      20
SFX VS ći     gnem       ći
SFX VS ći     gneš       ći
SFX VS ći     gne        ći
SFX VS ći     gnemo      ći
SFX VS ći     gnete      ći
SFX VS ći     gnu        ći
SFX VS ći     goh        ći
SFX VS ći     že         ći
SFX VS ći     gosmo      ći
SFX VS ći     goste      ći
SFX VS ći     goše       ći
SFX VS ći     gni        ći
SFX VS ći     gnimo      ći
SFX VS ći     gnite      ći
SFX VS ći     gao        ći
SFX VS ći     gla        ći
SFX VS ći     glo        ći
SFX VS ći     gli        ći
SFX VS ći     gle        ći
SFX VS ći     gavši      ći

SFX VR Y      19
SFX VR jeći   iječem     jeći
SFX VR jeći   iječeš     jeći
SFX VR jeći   iječe      jeći
SFX VR jeći   iječemo    jeći
SFX VR jeći   iječete    jeći
SFX VR jeći   ijeku      jeći
SFX VR jeći   jekoh      jeći
SFX VR jeći   jekosmo    jeći
SFX VR jeći   jekoste    jeći
SFX VR jeći   jekoše     jeći
SFX VR jeći   ijeci      jeći
SFX VR jeći   ijecimo    jeći
SFX VR jeći   ijecite    jeći
SFX VR jeći   jekao      jeći
SFX VR jeći   jekla      jeći
SFX VR jeći   jeklo      jeći
SFX VR jeći   jekli      jeći
SFX VR jeći   jekle      jeći
SFX VR jeći   jekavši    jeći

SFX VQ Y      20
SFX VQ ći     čem        ći
SFX VQ ći     češ        ći
SFX VQ ći     če         ći
SFX VQ ći     čemo       ći
SFX VQ ći     čete       ći
SFX VQ ći     ku         ći
SFX VQ ći     cijah      ći
SFX VQ ći     cijaše     ći
SFX VQ ći     cijasmo    ći
SFX VQ ći     cijaste    ći
SFX VQ ći     cijahu     ći
SFX VQ ći     ci         ći
SFX VQ ći     cimo       ći
SFX VQ ći     cite       ći
SFX VQ ći     kao        ći
SFX VQ ći     kla        ći
SFX VQ ći     klo        ći
SFX VQ ći     kli        ći
SFX VQ ći     kle        ći
SFX VQ ći     kući       ći

SFX VP Y      20
SFX VP jeći   iječem     jeći
SFX VP jeći   iječeš     jeći
SFX VP jeći   iječe      jeći
SFX VP jeći   iječemo    jeći
SFX VP jeći   iječete    jeći
SFX VP jeći   ijeku      jeći
SFX VP jeći   ijecijah   jeći
SFX VP jeći   ijecijaše  jeći
SFX VP jeći   ijecijasmo jeći
SFX VP jeći   ijecijaste jeći
SFX VP jeći   ijecijahu  jeći
SFX VP jeći   ijeci      jeći
SFX VP jeći   ijecimo    jeći
SFX VP jeći   ijecite    jeći
SFX VP jeći   jekao      jeći
SFX VP jeći   jekla      jeći
SFX VP jeći   jeklo      jeći
SFX VP jeći   jekli      jeći
SFX VP jeći   jekle      jeći
SFX VP jeći   ijekući    jeći

SFX VO Y      19
SFX VO 0      a          . 
SFX VO 0      u          .
SFX VO 0      e          .
SFX VO 0      om         [^čćšj]
SFX VO 0      em         [čćšj]
SFX VO 0      i          [^kgh]
SFX VO 0      ima        [^kgh]
SFX VO k      če         k
SFX VO k      ci         k
SFX VO k      cima       k
SFX VO g      že         g
SFX VO g      zi         g
SFX VO g      zima       g
SFX VO h      še         h
SFX VO h      si         h
SFX VO h      sima       h
SFX VO nt     nata       nt
SFX VO kt     kata       kt
SFX VO kl     kala       kl

SFX VN Y      21
SFX VN nin    nina       nin
SFX VN nin    ninu       nin
SFX VN nin    nine       nin
SFX VN nin    ninom      nin
SFX VN nin    ni         nin
SFX VN nin    na         nin
SFX VN nin    ne         nin
SFX VN nin    nima       nin
SFX VN ko     ka         ko
SFX VN ko     ku         ko
SFX VN ko     kom        ko
SFX VN ko     ci         ko
SFX VN ko     aka        ko
SFX VN ko     cima       ko
SFX VN ko     ke         ko
SFX VN 0      la         vo
SFX VN 0      lu         vo
SFX VN 0      le         vo
SFX VN 0      lom        vo
SFX VN 0      li         vo
SFX VN 0      lima       vo

SFX VM Y      51
SFX VM ac     ca         ac
SFX VM ac     cu         ac
SFX VM ac     če         ac
SFX VM ac     cem        ac
SFX VM ac     ci         ac
SFX VM ac     aca        ac
SFX VM ac     cima       ac
SFX VM ac     ce         ac
SFX VM ak     ka         ak
SFX VM ak     ku         ak
SFX VM ak     če         [^čćs]ak
SFX VM ak     kom        ak
SFX VM ak     ci         ak
SFX VM ak     aka        ak
SFX VM ak     cima       ak
SFX VM ak     ke         ak
SFX VM alj    lja        alj
SFX VM alj    lju        alj
SFX VM alj    ljem       alj
SFX VM alj    lji        alj
SFX VM alj    alja       alj
SFX VM alj    ljima      alj
SFX VM alj    lje        alj
SFX VM am     ma         am
SFX VM am     mu         am
SFX VM am     me         am
SFX VM am     mom        am
SFX VM am     mi         am
SFX VM am     ama        am
SFX VM am     mima       am
SFX VM anj    nja        anj
SFX VM anj    nju        anj
SFX VM anj    njem       anj
SFX VM anj    nji        anj
SFX VM anj    anja       anj
SFX VM anj    njima      anj
SFX VM anj    nje        anj
SFX VM ar     ra         ar
SFX VM ar     ru         ar
SFX VM ar     re         ar
SFX VM ar     rom        ar
SFX VM ar     ri         ar
SFX VM ar     ara        ar
SFX VM ar     rima       ar
SFX VM at     ta         at
SFX VM at     tu         at
SFX VM at     te         at
SFX VM at     tom        at
SFX VM at     ti         at
SFX VM at     ata        at
SFX VM at     tima       at

AF VV	# 195
AF VU	# 196
AF VUVT	# 197
AF VUVTVS	# 198
AF VT	# 199
AF VS	# 201
AF VR	# 202
AF VQ	# 203
AF VP	# 204
AF VO	# 205
AF VOUJ	# 217
AF VOUJUA	# 221
AF VOUJTQ	# 222
AF VOUJTQUA	# 223
AF VOUJTPUA	# 227
AF VOUJTOTMUA	# 231
AF VOUJTMUA	# 235
AF VOUA	# 238
AF VN	# 242
AF VNUJ	# 243
AF VNUJUA	# 244
AF VNUJTO	# 245
AF VNUF	# 246
AF VM	# 247
AF VMUG	# 256
AF VMUGUA	# 257
AF VMUA	# 259
